Tennessee, session 114, HB1962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-303(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), there is a rebuttable presumption that a
defendant convicted of aggravated assault under § 39-13-102 is not a favorable
candidate for probation if the offense involved the use or display of a firearm during the
commission of the offense.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
HB1962
011654
- 1 -